Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3716
Hotel;
occupancy; county; impose sales tax; when.

(1) The governing
body of any county may after a public hearing adopt a resolution to impose
an additional sales tax of not to exceed two percent upon the total consideration
charged for occupancy of any space furnished by any hotel if such county has
created a County Visitors Promotion Fund and a visitors committee pursuant
to section 81-3717. The proceeds from
such tax shall be paid to the County Visitors Promotion Fund.

(2) The governing body of any county may after a public hearing adopt
a resolution to impose an additional sales tax of not to exceed two percent
upon the total consideration charged for occupancy of any space furnished
by any hotel if such county has created a County Visitors Improvement Fund
and a visitors committee pursuant to section 81-3717. The
proceeds from such tax shall be paid to the County Visitors Improvement Fund.

(3) The taxes authorized by this section shall be in addition to the
tax authorized in section 81-3715 or any other sales
tax imposed or authorized.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 10;

Laws 1989, LB 262, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 726, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1254;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 16.